Utah statutes.
48-2c-1503 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Rendering professional services.

(1)  A professional services company may render professional services in this state only through individuals licensed or otherwise authorized in this state to render those services.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not:

(a)  require an individual employed by a professional services company to be licensed to perform services for the company if a license is not otherwise required;

(b)  prohibit a licensed individual from rendering professional services in his capacity although he is a member, manager, employee, or agent of a professional services company; or

(c)  prohibit an individual licensed in another state from rendering professional services for a professional services company in this state if not prohibited by the regulating board.

(3)  A professional services company may not render any professional service other than the professional service authorized by its articles of organization.

